Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1935
Opinion of appellate court; certified to clerk of district court.

It shall be the duty of the Clerk of the Supreme Court immediately upon the entering of a judgment by the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court to certify without cost a copy of the opinion of the court to the clerk of the district court from which the appeal was prosecuted.

Laws 1933, c. 39, § 1, p. 245;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 20-1935;

R.S.1943, § 25-1935;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 64.

Opinion of Supreme Court, duly certified, must be filed in the case in the trial court. Equitable Life Assur. Soc. v. Gillan, 70 F.Supp. 640 (D. Neb. 1945).